Florida, session 2026, SB294.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 9 10 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âConnecting to Care 11 Act.â 12 Section 2.âSubsections (6) and (7) of section 397.427, 13 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 14 397.427âMedication-assisted treatment service providers; 15 rehabilitation program; needs assessment and provision of 16 services; persons authorized to issue takeout medication; 17 unlawful operation; penalty.â 18 (6)âA physician assistant, a registered nurse, an advanced 19 practice registered nurse, or a licensed practical nurse, or a 20 pharmacist working for a licensed service provider may deliver 21 medication as prescribed by rule if: 22 (a)âThe service provider is authorized to provide 23 medication-assisted treatment; 24 (b)âThe medication has been administered pursuant to a 25 valid prescription written by the programâs physician who is 26 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459; and 27 (c)âThe medication ordered appears on a formulary or meets 28 federal requirements for medication-assisted treatment. 29 (7)âEach licensed service provider that provides 30 medication-assisted treatment must adopt written protocols as 31 specified by the department and in accordance with federally 32 required rules, regulations, or procedures. The protocol shall 33 provide for the supervision of the physician assistant, 34 registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or 35 licensed practical nurse working under the supervision of, or a 36 pharmacist acting pursuant to s. 465.1893 under an established 37 protocol with, a physician who is licensed under chapter 458 or 38 chapter 459. The protocol must specify how the medication will 39 be used in conjunction with counseling or psychosocial treatment 40 and that the services provided will be included on the treatment 41 plan. The protocol must specify the procedures by which 42 medication-assisted treatment may be administered by the 43 physician assistant, registered nurse, advanced practice 44 registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse, or pharmacist. 45 These protocols shall be signed by the supervising physician and 46 the administering physician assistant, registered nurse, 47 advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse, 48 or pharmacist. 49 Section 3.âSection 465.1893, Florida Statutes, is amended 50 to read: 51 465.1893âAdministration of antipsychotic medication and 52 medication for the treatment of opiate addiction by injection.â 53 (1)(a)âA pharmacist, at the direction of a physician 54 licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459, may administer a 55 long-acting antipsychotic medication or medication for the 56 treatment of opiate addiction approved by the United States Food 57 and Drug Administration by injection to a patient if the 58 pharmacist: 59 1.âIs authorized by and acting within the framework of an 60 established protocol with the prescribing physician. 61 2.âPractices at a facility that accommodates privacy for 62 nondeltoid injections and conforms with state rules and 63 regulations regarding the appropriate and safe disposal of 64 medication and medical waste. 65 3.âHas completed the course required under subsection (2). 66 (b)âA separate prescription from a physician is required 67 for each injection administered by a pharmacist under this 68 subsection. 69 (2)(a)âA pharmacist seeking to administer a long-acting 70 antipsychotic medication or medication for the treatment of 71 opiate addiction by injection must complete an 8-hour continuing 72 education course offered by: 73 1.âA statewide professional association of physicians in 74 this state accredited to provide educational activities 75 designated for the American Medical Association Physicianâs 76 Recognition Award (AMA PRA) Category 1 Credit or the American 77 Osteopathic Association (AOA) Category 1-A continuing medical 78 education (CME) credit; and 79 2.âA statewide association of pharmacists. 80 (b)âThe course may be offered in a distance learning format 81 and must be included in the 30 hours of continuing professional 82 pharmaceutical education required under s. 465.009(1). The 83 course shall have a curriculum of instruction that concerns the 84 safe and effective administration of behavioral health and 85 antipsychotic medications or medications for the treatment of 86 opiate addiction by injection, as applicable, including, but not 87 limited to, potential allergic reactions to such medications. 88 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.